Nebraska, session 109, LB856.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB856 LB856
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 9 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Community Reinvestment and Equity Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) Qualified census tracts experience disproportionate health
burdens and neighborhood disinvestment alongside high concentrations of
alcohol, tobacco, and fuel retail;
(b) Residents of qualified census tracts face higher barriers to
primary care, re-entry housing and services, access to healthy foods,
affordable childcare, and community-stabilizing initiatives;
(c) To meet the needs of low-income and moderate-income
neighborhoods, a community reinvestment framework should apply to covered
businesses operating in qualified census tracts; and
(d) A geographically targeted excise tax supports health and safety,
is rationally related to legitimate public purposes, and is distinct from
a uniform property tax.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to:
(a) Impose a five percent community reinvestment excise tax on
covered businesses operating in qualified census tracts;
(b) Establish a public rating of community reinvestment performance;
and
(c) Direct proceeds to federally qualified health centers, homeless
services, re-entry housing, healthy food access, childcare, and community
development initiatives.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Community Reinvestment and Equity Act:
(1) Covered business means any gas station, convenience store, or
package liquor store that sells alcoholic liquor, tobacco products as
defined in section 77-4007, or cigarettes as defined in section 77-2601,
for off-premises consumption and has a fixed place of business located
within a qualified census tract;
(2) Department means the Department of Economic Development;
(3) Gross receipts has the same meaning as in section 77-2701.16;
-2-

LB856 LB856
2026 2026
and
(4) Qualified census tract means a census tract designated by the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development under section
26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 4. (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, a five percent excise tax is
imposed on the gross receipts of each covered business located within a
qualified census tract.
(2) The excise tax shall be collected, reported, and remitted in the
same manner as the sales tax under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, on
forms prescribed by the Tax Commissioner.
(3) All taxes collected under this section shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Community Reinvestment Fund.
(4) The Tax Commissioner shall provide information to the
department, upon request, regarding the amount of excise tax collected in
a given qualified census tract.
(5) The provisions of sections 77-2703 to 77-2713 relating to
deficiencies, penalties, interest, the collection of delinquent amounts,
confidentiality, refunds, and appeal procedures for the tax imposed by
section 77-2703 shall also apply to the tax imposed by this section.
(6) The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to carry out his or her duties under the Community
Reinvestment and Equity Act.
Sec. 5. (1) No covered business may advertise the excise tax as a
surcharge on any specific product, however nothing prohibits making price
adjustments in the ordinary course of business.
(2)(a) A violation of this section is a deceptive trade practice for
purposes of the Consumer Protection Act and the Uniform Deceptive Trade
Practices Act.
(b) The Attorney General shall have authority to enforce violations
of this section pursuant to the Consumer Protection Act and the Uniform
Deceptive Trade Practices Act.
-3-

LB856 LB856
2026 2026
Sec. 6. (1) On or before April 1, 2028, and on or before April 1 of
each year thereafter, each covered business shall file an annual
community reinvestment report with the department detailing:
(a) Investments or in-kind contributions to federally qualified
health centers, homeless and re-entry services, healthy food access,
childcare, or community development initiatives in the qualified census
tract where the covered business operates;
(b) Local hiring, apprenticeships, or workforce partnerships;
(c) Participation in a healthy corner store program, Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program and WIC program enrollment support, or
similar programs; and
(d) Community engagement activities.
(2) The department shall publish an annual rating for each covered
business on its website based on weighted criteria that include, but are
not limited to, impact, equity reach, transparency, and collaboration,
using the following ratings:
(a) Outstanding or Satisfactory. Any covered business that receives
an outstanding or satisfactory rating will receive (i) recognition on the
department's website, (ii) eligibility preference in applicable state
façade improvement grants administered by the department, and (iii)
consideration in local licensing where lawful;
(b) Needs to Improve. The department shall development a technical
assistance plan for any covered business that receives a rating of needs
to improve to assist in improving the rating of the covered business; and
(c) Noncompliance. Failure to file an annual community reinvestment
report with the department or any material misstatement made in any such
report will result in a rating of noncompliance. The penalty for
receiving a rating of noncompliance is a fine of up to ten thousand
dollars per location. For any subsequent ratings of noncompliance, the
penalty shall be a fine of up to fifty thousand dollars per location.
(3)(a) Any covered business aggrieved by the imposition of a fine
-4-

LB856 LB856
2026 2026
under this section may request a hearing on any such fine imposed by the
department.
(b) A request for hearing shall be made within thirty days after the
receipt of the notice of the imposition of a fine. Such hearing shall be
conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act and the
rules and regulations of the department.
(c) A covered business may appeal any decision of the department
under this section and the appeal shall be in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. 7. (1)(a) The Community Reinvestment Fund is hereby created.
The fund shall be administered by the department to be used for grants
for the following purposes: Childcare, early childhood development,
community development initiatives, healthcare, healthy food access,
homeless services, and re-entry housing.
(b) The fund shall consist of money transferred pursuant to
subsection (3) of section 4 of this act, bequests, donations, gifts, and
grants.
(c) Any money in the Community Reinvestment Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
(2)(a) Beginning January 1, 2028, the department, in consultation
with the Department of Health and Human Services, shall administer a
grant program and make awards annually based on the following criteria:
(i) Childcare and early childhood services serving low-income
families: Fifteen percent of the total number of grants awarded;
(ii) Community development initiatives, including, but not limited
to, violence prevention, neighborhood revitalization, and workforce
pipelines: Fifteen percent of the total number of grants awarded;
(iii) Federally qualified health centers: Thirty percent of the
total number of grants awarded;
-5-

LB856 LB856
2026 2026
(iv) Healthy food access: Fifteen percent of the total number of
grants awarded; and
(v) Homelessness prevention, re-entry housing, and services: Twenty-
five percent of the total number of grants awarded.
(b) In awarding grants (i) at least seventy percent of the excise
tax collected from a given qualified census tract shall be awarded within
that same qualified census tract and (ii) up to thirty percent of the
excise tax collected in adjacent qualified census tracts may be pooled
regionally across such qualified census tracts for efficiency and impact.
(3) The department in making awards shall prioritize measurable
outcomes in access to care, housing stability, healthy food availability,
childcare slots, community development, recidivism reduction, and
projects led by and serving the residents of a qualified census tract.
(4) Grants awarded under this section shall supplement, not
supplant, existing state or local funding.
(5) The combined administrative costs for the department and the
Department of Health and Human Services to administer the fund and the
grant program shall not exceed five percent of annual deposits in the
Community Reinvestment Fund.
(6) The department may audit grantees for performance and compliance
at any time during the term of the grant and within twelve months after
the conclusion of the term of the grant.
(7) A grantee may appeal any decision of the department and the
appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. 8. (1) The department shall maintain a searchable database on
its website showing (a) covered business filings, investments, and
ratings, and (b) grants awarded by qualified census tract.
(2) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
necessary to carry out its duties under the Community Reinvestment and
Equity Act.
Sec. 9. The Community Reinvestment and Equity Act shall be
-6-

LB856 LB856
2026 2026
construed as a geographically targeted excise tax rationally related to
the legislative purpose of mitigating documented health and safety harms
and promoting reinvestment in qualified census tracts.
-7-